Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-765
Copies of sections; distribution.

Copies of sections 29-759 to 29-765 shall, upon its approval, be transmitted by the Secretary of State to the Governor of each state, the Attorney General and the administrator of general services of the United States, and the Council of State Governments.

Laws 1963, c. 154, § 7, p. 552.